California statutes. Education Code
(b) Credit for leave of absence need not be accrued prior to taking leave by the employee, and the leave of absence may be taken at any time during the college year. If the employee does not take the full amount of leave allowed in any school year under this section, the amount not taken shall be accumulated from year to year with additional days as the governing board may allow.

(c) The governing board of each community college district shall adopt rules and regulations requiring and prescribing the manner of proof of illness or injury for the purposes of this section. These rules and regulations shall not discriminate against evidence of treatment and the need therefor by the practice of the religion of any well-recognized church or denomination.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to modify or repeal any provision in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 120175) of Part 1 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Section 87780 does not apply to the first 10 days of absence on account of illness or accident of any employee employed five days per week or to the proportion of 10 days of absence to which the employee employed less than five days per week is entitled hereunder on account of illness or accident or to additional days granted by the governing board. Any employee shall have the right to utilize sick leave provided for in this section and the benefit provided by Section 87780 for absences necessitated by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, and recovery therefrom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 41.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

87781.5.

The governing board of a community college district may adopt rules permitting academic employees of the district to use leave earned pursuant to Section 87781 in cases of compelling personal importance.

Leave taken pursuant to this section, together with any leave taken pursuant to Section 87784, shall not exceed six days in any single school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 149.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87782.

(a) An academic employee of a community college district who has been an employee of that district for a period of one school year or more shall have transferred with the employee to a second district the total amount of leave of absence for illness or injury to which the employee is entitled under Section
 87781.

(b) The board of governors shall adopt rules and regulations prescribing the manner in which the first district shall certify to the second district the total amount of leave of absence for illness or injury to be transferred. No governing board shall adopt any policy or rule, written or unwritten, that requires any employee transferring to its district to waive any part or all of
 the leave of absence that the employee may be entitled to have transferred in accordance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 100, Sec. 1.   (AB 706)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

87783.

(a) The accumulated leave of absences for illness and injury of each of the following persons shall be transferred with them to their second position:

(1) Any academic employee of a community college district who accepts a position requiring certification qualifications in the office of any county superintendent of schools.

(2) Any certificated employee of any county superintendent of schools who accepts an academic position in a community college district or office of another county superintendent of schools.

(3) Any person employed by the board of governors in a position requiring certification
 qualifications or an employee of the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges who accepts an academic position in a community college district or a position requiring certification qualifications in the office of any county superintendent of schools.

(4) Any certificated employee of the Commission on Teacher Credentialing who accepts an academic position in any community college district.

(b) The amount of leave to be transferred pursuant to this section shall be determined in the same manner as provided in Section 87782. All other provisions of Section 87782 shall also apply to the employees and employers described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 27.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

87784.

Any days of leave of absence for illness or injury allowed pursuant to Section 87781 may be used by the employee, at his election, in cases of personal necessity. The governing board of each community college district shall adopt rules and regulations requiring and prescribing the manner of proof of personal necessity for purposes of this section.

The employee shall not be required to secure advance permission for leave taken for any of the following reasons:

(a) Death or serious illness of a member of his immediate family.

(b) Accident, involving his person or property, or the person or property of a member of his immediate family.

No such accumulated leave in excess of six (6) days may be used in any school year for the purposes enumerated in this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87784.5.

(a) An academic employee may take up to 30 days of leave in a school year, less any days of leave authorized pursuant to Sections 87781.5 and 87784, in either of the following circumstances:

(1) A biological parent may use leave pursuant to this section within the first year of his or her infant’s birth.

(2) A nonbiological parent may use leave pursuant to this section within the first year of legally adopting a child.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect before January 1, 2015, the provisions of this section do not
 apply to the public employer and public employees subject to that agreement until the expiration or renewal of the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 132.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

87785.

Any person employed by a community college district, in an academic position who accepts a professional education position in the chancellor’s office of the California community colleges, the appointment to which is, or is intended to become, permanent, shall have transferred with him or her to the chancellor’s office of the California community colleges his accumulated leave of absence for illness or injury. The amount of leave to be transferred shall be determined in the same manner as provided in Section 87782, except in no case may the transferred accumulated sick leave exceed that amount of accumulated sick leave that the person would have earned as an employee in the system to which he or she is transferring. All other provisions of Section 87782 shall also apply to the employees and employers described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 152.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87786.

Section 87780 shall not apply to any community college district which adopts and maintains in effect a rule that provides that when a person employed in an academic position is absent from their duties on account of
 illness or accident for a period of five school months or less whether or not the absence arises out of or in the course of the employment of the employee, the employee shall receive 50 percent or more of their regular salary during the period of the absence and nothing in Section 87780 shall be construed as preventing the governing board of any district from adopting any such rule.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, when a person employed in an academic position is absent from
 their duties on account of illness for a period of more than five school months, or when a person is absent from their duties for a cause other than illness, the amount deducted from the salary due the employee for the month in which the absence occurs shall be determined according to the rules and regulations established by the governing board of the district. These rules and regulations shall not conflict with rules and regulations of the board of governors.

Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to deprive any
 district, city, or city and county of the right to make any reasonable rule for the regulation of accident or sick leave or cumulative accident or sick leave without loss of salary for academic employees.

This section shall be applicable whether or not the absence from duty is by reason of a leave of absence granted by the governing board of the employing district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 129, Sec. 3.   (AB 3374)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

87787.

(a) The governing board of a community college district shall provide by rules and regulations for industrial accident and illness leaves of absence for all academic employees. The governing board of a community college district that is created or whose boundaries or status is changed by an action to organize or reorganize community college districts completed after January 1, 1976, shall provide by rules and regulations for those leaves of absence on or before the date on which the organization or reorganization of the community college district becomes effective.

(b) The rules or regulations shall include all of the following provisions:

(1) Allowable leave shall be for not less than 60 days during
 which the community colleges of the district are required to be in session or when the employee would otherwise have been performing work for the community college district in any one fiscal year for the same accident.

(2) Allowable leave shall not be accumulated from year to year.

(3) Industrial accident or illness leave shall commence on the first day of absence.

(4) (A) When an academic employee is absent from his or her duties on account of an industrial accident or illness, the employee shall be paid the portion of the salary due him or her for any month in which the absence occurs as, when added to his or her temporary disability indemnity under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) or Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100) of the Labor Code, will result in a payment to the
 employee of not more than his or her full salary.

(B) The phrase “full salary,” as used in this subdivision, shall be computed so that it shall not be less than the employee’s “average weekly earnings” as that phrase is used in Section 4453 of the Labor Code. For purposes of this section, however, the maximum and minimum average weekly earnings set forth in Section 4453 of the Labor Code shall otherwise not be deemed applicable.

(5) Industrial accident or illness leave shall be reduced by one day for each day of authorized absence regardless of a temporary disability indemnity award.

(6) When an industrial accident or illness leave overlaps into the next fiscal year, the employee shall be entitled to only the amount of unused leave due him or her for the same illness or injury.

(c) Upon termination of the industrial accident or illness leave, the employee shall be entitled to the benefits provided in Sections 87780, 87781, and 87786, and, for purposes of each of these sections, his or her absence shall be deemed to have commenced on the date of termination of the industrial accident or illness leave. However, if the employee continues to receive temporary disability indemnity, he or she may elect to take as much of his or her accumulated sick leave as, when added to his or her temporary disability indemnity, will result in a payment to the employee of not more than his or her full salary.

(d) The governing board of a community college district, by rule or regulation, may provide for additional leave of absence for industrial accident or illness as it deems appropriate.

(e) During a paid leave
 of absence, the employee may endorse to the community college district the temporary disability indemnity checks received on account of his or her industrial accident or illness. The community college district, in turn, shall issue the employee appropriate salary warrants for payment of the employee’s salary and shall deduct normal retirement, other authorized contributions, and the temporary disability indemnity, if any, actually paid to and retained by the employee for periods covered by the salary warrants.

(f) In the absence of rules and regulations adopted by the governing board of a community college district pursuant to this section, an employee shall be entitled to industrial accident or illness leave as provided in this section but without limitation as to the number of days of leave.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 74.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

87788.

Every person employed by a community college district in an academic position is entitled to a leave of absence, not to exceed three days, or five days if out-of-state travel is required, on account of the death of any member of his or her immediate family. No deduction shall be made from the salary of the employee or shall the leave be deducted from leave granted by other sections of this code or provided by the governing board of the district. The governing board may enlarge the benefits of this section and may expand the class of relatives listed below as members of the immediate family. Members of the immediate family, as used in this section, means the mother, father, grandmother, grandfather, or a grandchild of the employee or of the spouse of the employee, and the spouse, son, son-in-law, daughter, daughter-in-law, brother, or sister of the employee, or any relative living in the immediate household of the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 155.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87789.

The governing board of a community college district may grant a leave of absence to any academic employee who has applied for disability allowance, not to exceed 30 days beyond final determination of the disability allowance by the State Teachers’ Retirement System. If the employee is determined to be eligible for the disability allowance by the system, the leave shall be extended for the term of disability, but not more than 39 months.

Governing boards of community college districts shall classify as temporary employees those persons employed to fill vacancies caused by the absence of academic employees who are classified as permanent and are receiving a disability or insurance allowance or benefit from the system or from a group insurance plan for which the employer is paying the cost or deducting the cost from the employees’ salaries.

For purposes of this section, the term of employment of the temporary employee shall be equal to the number of days of absence of the employee receiving the disability allowance.

If the term of employment extends beyond this period, the employee shall be credited for all days served as a probationary employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 156.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87790.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, except Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000), the governing body of a community college district may adopt a workload balancing program for academic employees, under which time worked in excess of that required for a full-time position is banked and an equivalent paid leave of absence is granted in a subsequent quarter, semester, or academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 183.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Salaries [87801. - 87834.5.]

87801.

The governing board of a community college district shall fix and order paid the compensation of persons employed by the board as academic employees unless otherwise prescribed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 157.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87802.

The governing board of each community college district shall adopt and cause to be printed and made available to each academic employee a schedule of salaries to be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 158.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87804.

The governing board of a community college district may employ such temporary employees of the district as it deems necessary and shall adopt and make public a salary schedule setting the daily or pay period rate or rates for temporary employees.

This section shall not be construed as modifying or repealing any law fixing a minimum annual salary for employees of district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87806.

The governing board of a community college district may at any time during any school year increase the salaries of persons employed by the district in academic positions. The increase shall be effective on any date ordered by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 160.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87807.

The governing board of community college district shall not decrease the annual salary of a person employed by the district in an academic position for failure to meet any requirement of the district that the person complete additional educational units, course of study, or work in any college or university or any equivalent thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 161.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87809.

If a community college district fails to pay the salary of any person employed by it in an academic position who has on file a contract of employment held valid by the legal adviser of the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district, that county superintendent of schools may transfer sufficient money from the funds of the district to the county school service fund and pay the salary from that fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 163.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87810.

Whenever a person has rendered service in an academic position, or the governing board of a district has employed a person in an academic position or the county superintendent has drawn an order for a warrant in favor of a person in an academic position, for a period of service during which the person did not have the qualifications required for the position as required by law, and when as a result thereof the employment of the person to render the service, the rendering of the service, the inclusion of the attendance of students taught by the person in the average daily attendance of the district, or the drawing of the order warrant for the service of that person, is in violation of any provision of this code, the employment, rendering of service, inclusion of attendance, or drawing of the order for the warrant shall be deemed fully legal for all purposes if the board of governors approves thereof in accordance with this section.

The board of governors shall adopt rules and regulations to establish procedures for a review in those cases and shall determine whether the rendering of the service shall be approved and made fully legal for all purposes. If the board gives its approval to the rendering of such service, then the employment, inclusion of attendance, and drawing of the order for the warrant shall be automatically approved and made fully legal for all purposes.

Unless and until amended by the board of governors, the regulations shall provide that the rendering of the service shall be approved if either of the following circumstances apply:

(a) The board determines that the person rendering the service had the necessary qualifications during the period of service in question.

(b) The district governing board determines, through a process that meets the requirements of Section 87359, and based on reasonable evidence, that the person rendering the service had qualifications that are at least equivalent to the qualifications specified in regulations of the board of governors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 164.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87815.

A person in an academic position who serves less than a full school year shall receive as salary only an amount that bears the same ratio to the established annual salary for the position as the number of working days he or she serves bears to the total number of working days plus institutes in the annual school term, and any other day when the employee is required by the governing board to be present at the schools of the district. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, a person in an academic position who serves a complete semester shall receive not less than one-half of the established annual salary for the position. This section shall not be so construed as to prevent the payment of compensation to a person while on leave of absence when the payment of the compensation is authorized by law.

In the event any such person dies during the school year, his or her estate shall be entitled to receive, as salary owed to the decedent, an amount that bears the same ratio to the established annual salary for the position as the number of working days he or she served bears to the total number of working days plus institutes in the annual school term, and any other day when the employee was required by the governing board to be present at the schools of the district, less any salary paid to the decedent prior to his or her death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 165.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87816.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 87815, the governing board of a community college district may adopt an alternative method of computing the salary received by an academic employee who serves less than a full school year.

The alternative method shall include the deduction from the employee’s regular salary of only that amount actually paid to a substitute or, if a substitute is not employed, the amount which would have been paid to a substitute had a substitute been employed.

For the purposes of this section, the amount which would have been paid to a substitute is that amount established by the district in a published salary schedule for substitute employees.

The alternative method shall only be applied upon authorization by the community college board based upon individual employee application and shall be limited to no more than five days per school year for each employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 166.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87817.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 87815 or any other provision of law to the contrary, if a person is employed by a community college district in an academic position at the beginning of the second semester of a school year for services during that semester, the compensation of the employee shall be not less than one-half of the annual compensation for that position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 167.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87818.

Whenever a salary schedule increasing the salaries of its academic employees is adopted by a community college district to be effective at the commencement of the second semester of a school year:

(a) The compensation of the employees shall not exceed one-half of the annual compensation for their positions under the former salary schedule for services during the first semester.

(b) The compensation of the employees shall not be less than one-half of the annual compensation for their positions under the newly adopted salary schedule for services during the second semester.

This section shall not be construed to limit the time at which any salary increase ordered by the governing board shall become effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 168.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87821.

Each salary payment for any calendar month may be made on the last working day of the month and shall be paid not earlier than the last working day of the month and not later than the fifth day of the succeeding calendar month except that faculty employed for less than full time in classes for adults, in a day or evening community college, shall be paid on or before the 10th day of the succeeding calendar month for services performed during the preceding calendar month.

If the community college district provides for the payment of the salary of employees employed in academic positions once each two weeks, twice a month, or once each four weeks, each salary payment may be made on the last working day of the payroll period and shall be made not earlier than the last working day of the payroll period and not later than the eighth working day of the following payroll period.

This section shall not prohibit a district from making a payment of earned salary prior to the last working day of the month or payroll period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 170.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87822.

Except as provided in Section 87790, when any community college district employs an academic employee to perform instruction or other services in addition to his or her regular instructing duties, or when a district employs an academic employee to perform instructing or other services at a summer school maintained by the district, the district shall pay the employee for those services either in one lump sum or at an hourly, daily, biweekly, quadriweekly, or monthly rate of pay. If the pay is in one lump sum, the district shall pay the employee within 10 days after the termination of the services. If the pay is at an hourly, daily, biweekly, quadriweekly or monthly rate, the district shall pay the employee within 10 days after the end of each calendar month or pay period during which the services are performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 171.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87823.

Instead of issuing a single warrant to each employee for salary or wages the district may use a payroll form of warrant making payment to two or more employees on one payroll warrant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87824.

When the payroll form of warrant is used, the approved and allowed payroll warrant shall be deposited with the county treasurer, who shall make payment to the employee or his order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87825.

When the payroll form of warrant is used the name of each employee shall be listed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87828.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, no warrant shall be drawn in favor of any academic employee, unless the officer whose duty it is to draw the warrant is satisfied that the employee has faithfully performed all the duties prescribed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 172.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87831.

Whenever reports are required to be filed with the county superintendent of schools by academic employees of districts authorized to issue warrants under the provision of Section 85266 and the reports have not been filed, the county superintendent of schools may direct the district in writing to withhold the salary payment due the employee involved. The payment should not be released to the employee until directed in writing by the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 173.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87832.

For the purposes of Section 395 of the Military and Veterans Code or any other provision of law providing for the payment of salary or compensation to an employee of a community college district while absent from duty because he or she is engaged in ordered military or naval duty, the employee’s salary or compensation for 30 days shall (a), with respect to an employee serving in an academic position, be deemed to be one-tenth of the annual salary established for the position and (b), with respect to an employee serving in a classified position, be deemed to be one month’s salary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87833.

(a) Except as provided in Section 87834, the governing board of each community college district, when drawing an order for the salary payment due to an academic employee of the district, shall reduce the order by the amount which the board has been requested in a revocable written authorization by the employee to deduct for the purpose of paying the dues of the employee for membership in any local professional organization, or in any statewide professional organization, or in any other professional organization affiliated or otherwise connected with a statewide professional organization which authorizes the statewide organization to receive membership dues on its behalf, or to deduct for the purpose of paying dues in, or for any other service, program, or committee provided or sponsored
 by, any certified or recognized employee organization, of which the employee is a bargaining unit member, whose membership consists, in whole or in part, of employees of the community college district, and which has as one of its objectives improvements in the terms and conditions of employment for the advancement of the welfare of the employees. Any revocation of a written authorization shall be in writing and shall be effective provided the revocation complies with the terms of the written authorization.

(b) Unless otherwise provided in an agreement negotiated pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the governing board shall, no later than the 10th day of each pay period for academic employees, draw its order upon the funds of the district in favor of the organization designated by the employee for an amount equal to the total of the dues or other deductions made with respect to
 that organization for the previous pay period and shall transmit the total amount to that organization no later than the 15th day of each pay period for academic employees. When timely transmittal of dues or other payments by a county is necessary for a community college district to comply with the provisions of this section, the county shall act in a timely manner. The governing board may deduct from the amount transmitted to the organization on whose account the dues or other payments were deducted the actual reasonable costs of making the deduction.

(c) The revocable written authorization shall remain in effect until expressly revoked in writing by the employee, pursuant to the terms of the written authorization. Whenever there is a change in the amount required for the payment to the organization, the employee organization shall provide the employee with adequate and necessary data on the change at a time sufficiently prior to the effective
 date of the change to allow the employee an opportunity to revoke the written authorization, if desired and if permitted by the terms of the written authorization. The employee organization shall provide the public school employer with notification of the change at a time sufficiently prior to the effective date of the change to allow the employer an opportunity to make the necessary adjustments and with a copy of the notification of the change which has been sent to all concerned employees.

(d) The governing board shall not require the completion of a new deduction authorization when a dues or other change has been effected or at any other time without the express approval of the concerned employee organization.

(e) The governing board shall honor the terms of the employee’s written authorization for payroll deductions. Employee requests to cancel or change authorizations for
 payroll deductions for employee organizations shall be directed to the employee organization rather than to the governing board. The employee organization shall be responsible for processing these requests. The governing board shall rely on information provided by the employee organization regarding whether deductions for an employee organization were properly canceled or changed, and the employee organization shall indemnify the district for any claims made by the employee for deductions made in reliance on that information.

(f) A certified or recognized employee organization that certifies that it has and will maintain individual employee authorizations shall not be required to submit to the governing board of a community college district a copy of the employee’s written authorization in order for the payroll deductions described in this section to be effective, unless a dispute arises about the existence or terms of the written
 authorization. The employee organization shall indemnify the district for any claims made by the employee for deductions made in reliance on its notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 53, Sec. 3.   (SB 866)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

87834.

The governing board of each community college district when drawing an order for the salary or wage payment due to an academic employee of the district shall, with or without charge, reduce the order for the payment of service fees to the certified or recognized organization as required in an organizational security arrangement between the exclusive representative and a public school employer as provided under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. However, the organizational security arrangement shall provide that any employee may pay service fees directly to the certified or recognized employee organization in lieu of having the service fees deducted from the salary or wage order.

If the employees of a district do not authorize the board to make a deduction to pay their pro rata share of the costs of making deductions for the payment of service fees to the certificated or recognized organization, the board shall deduct from the amount transmitted to the organization on whose account the payments were deducted the actual costs, if any, of making the deduction. No charge shall exceed the actual cost to the district of the deduction. These actual costs shall be determined by the board and shall include startup and ongoing costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 176.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87834.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a community college district that collects or deducts dues, agency fees, fair share fees, or any other fee or amount of money from the salary of an academic employee for the purpose of transmitting the money to an employee organization shall transmit the money to the employee organization within 15 days of issuing the paycheck containing the deduction to the employee.

(b) (1) This section does not limit the right of an employee organization or affected employee to sue for a failure of the employer to transmit dues or fees pursuant to this section.

(2) In an action brought for a violation of subdivision (a), the court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party if any party to the action requests attorney fees and costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 344, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Part-Time Community College Faculty Health Insurance Program [87860. - 87868.]

87860.

It is the intent of the Legislature that part-time community college faculty and their eligible dependents have continuous access to health insurance benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 943, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

87860.5.

There is hereby established the Part-Time Community College Faculty Health Insurance Program for the purpose of providing a state incentive program to encourage community college districts to offer health insurance for part-time faculty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 943, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

87861.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Health insurance benefits” include medical benefits and may include vision or dental benefits.

(b) “Multidistrict part-time faculty” refers to any faculty member whose total teaching assignments at two or more community college districts equals or exceeds
 40 percent of the cumulative equivalent of a minimum full-time teaching assignment. “Multidistrict part-time faculty” does not include “part-time faculty” as defined in subdivision (c).

(c) “Part-time faculty” refers to any faculty member whose teaching assignment equals or exceeds 40 percent of the cumulative equivalent of a minimum full-time teaching assignment.

(d) The changes made to subdivision (c) during the 1999 portion of the 1999–2000 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be operative in any fiscal year only if funds are appropriated for purposes of those changes in the annual Budget Act or in another measure. If the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act or in another measure for purposes of this section is insufficient to fully fund those changes for the fiscal year, the chancellor shall prorate the funds among the community college districts affected by this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 25.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

87862.

The governing board of a community college district may provide a program of health insurance for part-time faculty, multidistrict part-time faculty, and their dependents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 11.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

87863.

(a) A part-time faculty member and their eligible dependents are eligible to participate in the program established pursuant to this article.

(b) A multidistrict part-time faculty member and their eligible dependents are eligible to participate in the program established pursuant to this article.

(c) The changes made to subdivision (a) during the 1999 portion of the 1999–2000 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be operative in any fiscal year only if funds are appropriated for purposes of those changes in the annual Budget Act or in another measure. If the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act or in another measure for purposes of this section is insufficient to fully fund those changes for the fiscal year, the chancellor shall prorate the funds among the community college districts affected by this section.
